Idaho, session 2026, S1271.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 52, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 5, Title 52, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5
PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY NUISANCES
52-501. RODENTS OF UNUSUAL SIZE -- NUISANCES. (1) The legislature
finds that the state of Idaho, in particular its more metropolitan areas,
has seen a dramatic increase in the presence of rats, which is especially
concerning given their lack of historic presence in Idaho and their ability
to easily transport diseases that are transmittable to humans and to cause
economic damage to agriculture and property.
(2) The Norway rat and the roof rat (rats) are hereby declared to be:
(a) A public health and safety nuisance, pursuant to the provisions of
this section;
(b) An invasive species for the purposes of chapter 19, title 22, Idaho
Code;
(c) An agricultural pest for the purposes of chapter 26, title 25, Idaho
Code; and
(d) A vermin and public health and welfare pest for the purposes of
chapter 28, title 39, Idaho Code.
(3) The director of the department of agriculture shall:
(a) Coordinate efforts, to the maximum extent possible, with:
(i) The boards of county commissioners within Idaho;
(ii) Control districts, the boards thereof, and the boards of
county commissioners operating pursuant to chapter 26, title 25,
Idaho Code;
(iii) Abatement districts, the boards thereof, and the boards of
county commissioners operating pursuant to chapter 28, title 39,
Idaho Code;
(iv) Public health districts and the boards thereof, pursuant to
chapter 4, title 39, Idaho Code;


(v) Any other state agency, department, or political subdivision
that the director determines necessary to enact the provisions of
this section; and
(vi) Any other entity, public or private, that the director deter-
mines necessary to coordinate or contract with to enact the provi-
sions of this section, including to promote public education mate-
rials;
(b) Develop and implement a coordinated plan to engage the public, po-
litical subdivisions, and other relevant stakeholders to determine the
extent and scope of rats in Idaho; and
(c) Develop and distribute public education material that promotes on-
going reporting and best practices to prevent and eradicate rats.
(4) The finding of a rat in Idaho is encouraged to be promptly reported
to the department of agriculture.
(a) The department shall collect and compile all such reports regarding
the presence of rats in order to determine:
(i) The movement and location of the rats;
(ii) Where abatement is necessary;
(iii) The type of abatement that is necessary; and
(iv) Where the department may need assistance to abate the rats.
(b) Such reports and educational materials shall be made publicly
available on the department's website.
(5) The department shall use such reports to create an abatement plan
that includes ongoing public education material distribution.
(a) The abatement plan shall:
(i) Summarize the extent and scope of rats in Idaho;
(ii) Describe the actions already taken and that are currently in
progress to address the rats;
(iii) Describe any planned future actions to address the rats;
(iv) Provide information on how to report the presence of rats to
the department; and
(v) Provide accessible ways to prevent or eliminate rats within
the community and household.
(b) The abatement plan shall be made publicly available on the depart-
ment's website.
(c) The department shall review and update, if necessary, the abatement
plan at least every three (3) years.
(d) The director shall present and provide the abatement plan to the
following legislative bodies for review during the 2027 legislative
session and any legislative session following a revision of the plan:
(i) The house and senate agricultural affairs committees;
(ii) The joint finance-appropriations committee; and
(iii) The interim committee on natural resources, if so requested.
(e) If the director determines that abatement actions should be under-
taken, the anticipated costs to abate the rats shall be included in the
director's report. Such moneys may be requested by the director and ap-
propriated by the legislature.
(6) State agencies and political subdivisions shall make themselves
available, subject to available personnel, equipment, and funding, to as-
sist the department in enacting the provisions of this section. Nothing in


this section shall require mandatory participation or the expenditure of
local funds.
(7) This section shall be known and may be cited as "The Idaho Rodents of
Unusual Size Act."
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.